Massachusetts, session 194th, H2269.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Whereas, Article 89, Section 8 of the Massachusetts Constitution allows the legislative 
body of the Town of Bridgewater to vote to submit a Special Act to the State Legislature to 
Amend the current Charter of the Town; 
Ordered, that the Town Council assembled voted to amend the Bridgewater Home Rule 
Charter, Article IV, Section 4-7 and to send said amendment to the State Legislature as a Special 
Act as follows: 
Section 4-7 shall be deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following: 
"Section 4-7. TEMPORARY ABSENCE 
In the event of a temporary absence by the Town Manager of not more than twenty-one 
consecutive days, the Assistant Town Manager shall perform the duties of that office. 

of 2 11  If the Assistant Town Manager is for any reason unable to serve, the Town Manager shall 
appoint a department head of the Town to perform the duties of that office during that period, by 
a letter filed with the Town Clerk and the Town Council. 
In the event of failure of the Town Manager to make such a designation of if the person 
so designated is for any reason unable to serve, or is deemed not qualified by the Town Council, 
the Town Council may appoint some other qualified person to perform the duties of the Town 
Manager until the Town Manager returns. 
No member of the Town Council shall serve as acting Town Manager." 
Said Amendment shall only become effective and is contingent upon by the Town 
Council, the State Legislature and the voters of the Town of Bridgewater.